Hawaii statutes.
§198D-3 Inventory. (a) The department
shall establish, maintain, and amend, as required, an inventory of all trails
and accesses in the State, whether wholly or partly on public or private lands
and whether or not under the jurisdiction of the department, and a separate
inventory of all trails and accesses to public hunting areas in the State. The
inventories shall include:

(1) Maps and lists of all trails and accesses;

(2) Name and length of each trail or access;

(3) The person or agency having management
responsibility for each trail or access;

(4) The predominant transportation mode for each
trail or access;

(5) The development standard, condition, and grade of
each trail and access;

(6) The description of amenities or other features on
or in close proximity to each trail or access;

(7) The status of availability to the general public
of each trail or access; and

(8) Other information for each trail or access deemed
necessary or desirable by the department.

(b) The department shall publish and
periodically update documents, which shall be available to the general public.
The documents shall contain that portion of the inventories which include
trails and accesses available for the use of the general public. The
department may charge an appropriate fee for the documents and any updates. [L
1988, c 236, pt of §2; am L 1990, c 53, §1(1)]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next